Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2404.03
Legislative intent.

It is the
intent of the Legislature to appropriate five million dollars to the Community-based
Juvenile Services Aid Program.

Laws 2014, LB464, § 31.